New York, session 2025-2026, A4287.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 344-r to 2 read as follows: 3 § 344-r. Portion of the state highway system to be designated as the 4 "Dr. John Flateau Memorial Highway". All that portion of the state high- 5 way system constituting state route twenty-seven, between Flatbush 6 Avenue and Albany Avenue in the neighborhood of East Flatbush, county of 7 Kings, shall be designated and known as the "Dr. John Flateau Memorial 8 Highway". 9 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 10 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 11 as designated pursuant to section one of this act. However, to avoid 12 confusion and to limit any possible disruption of commerce, the desig- 13 nation called for pursuant to section one of this act shall be one of 14 ceremonial nature and the official name of such highway shall not be 15 changed as a result of this act. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06603-01-5